District of Columbia statutes.
6-1034

Authorities and resources of the Commission.

(a)

The Mayor shall provide reasonable administrative and technical support, meeting space, and office supplies requested by the Commission to carry out its responsibilities under this subchapter.

(b)

The Commission may request from any department, agency, or instrumentality of the District government any information necessary to carry out its responsibilities under this subchapter. Every department, agency, and instrumentality shall cooperate with the Commission and provide, in a timely and complete manner, any information that the Commission requests pursuant to this subsection.

(c)

The Commission may enter into a contract with a government entity, private entity, or other organization or individual to conduct research or surveys, prepare reports, or perform other activities useful to the discharge of the responsibilities of the Commission under this subchapter.

(d)

The Commission may establish any advisory groups, committees, or subcommittees, consisting of members or nonmembers of this Commission, as it deems appropriate to carry out its responsibilities under this subchapter.

History

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1144, 49 DCR 6968

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-1033.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority to the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development pursuant to D.C. Law 14-90, see Mayor’s Order 2003-171, December 1, 2003 ( 50 DCR 10617).